Delaware, session 153, HB203.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Subchapter I, Chapter 41, Title 14 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 4150. Financial literacy education as a required Â½ credit. (a) For purposes of this section Â Â : (1) âCharter schoolâ means a public school established under Chapter 5 of this title. (2) âDepartment or DOEâ means the Department of Education. (3) âSchool districtâ means a clearly defined geographic subdivision of this State organized for the purpose of administering public education in that area and includes a district specifically created to administer a system of vocational or technical education. (b) A school district or charter school serving high school students shall provide, at a minimum, a 1/2 credit on financial literacy. (1) A standards-aligned curriculum with high rigorous instructional materials that includes assessments. (2) Opportunities for high-quality initial and ongoing professional learning made available to teachers by the local education agency. (c) Â Beginning with students entering grade 9 in the 2026 through 2027 school year, students must successfully complete a Â½ credit in Financial Literacy as part of the Social StudiesÂ  Â creditsÂ  Â requiredÂ  Â toÂ  Â receiveÂ  Â aÂ  Â highÂ  Â schoolÂ  Â diplomaÂ  Â issuedÂ  Â underÂ  Â Â§152(a)Â  Â ofÂ  Â thisÂ  Â title. (d) School districts and charter schools are encouraged to partner with private or public enterprises or individuals to add value to the student experience in the Â½ credit required underÂ  Â subsectionÂ  Â (b)Â  Â ofÂ  Â thisÂ  Â section.Â  Â TheseÂ  Â partnershipsÂ  Â mayÂ  Â includeÂ  Â servingÂ  Â asÂ  Â expertÂ  Â class presenters on financial literacy topics,Â  Â sponsoringÂ  Â studentÂ  Â competitions,Â  Â awarding scholarshipsÂ  Â forÂ  Â outstandingÂ  Â achievements,Â  and Â sponsoringÂ  Â orÂ  Â providingÂ  Â teacherÂ  Â professional development, or serving as expert presenters. (e) TheÂ  Â Department,Â  Â withÂ  Â theÂ  Â approvalÂ  Â ofÂ  Â theÂ  Â StateÂ  Â BoardÂ  Â ofÂ  Â Education,Â  Â shallÂ  Â adoptÂ  Â or update regulations to implement this legislation in accordance with the following: (1) TheÂ  Â currentÂ  Â FinancialÂ  Â LiteracyÂ  Â StandardsÂ  Â shallÂ  Â beÂ  Â nowÂ  Â includedÂ  Â asÂ  Â aÂ  Â partÂ  Â of Social Studies Standards. (2) FinancialÂ  Â LiteracyÂ  Â shallÂ  Â beÂ  Â consideredÂ  Â asÂ  Â aÂ  Â contentÂ  Â areaÂ  Â withinÂ  Â SocialÂ  Â Studies. Section 2. The Department of Education and the Professional Standards Board shall determine the certification necessary to qualify an educator to provide the credit required under Section 1 of this Act. Section 3. This Act may be cited as âThe Equity and Inclusion in Financial Literacy for All High School Students in Delaware Act.â. SYNOPSIS With 60% of U.S. households living paycheck to paycheck, 40% of Americans having less than $300 in savings, 33% of Americans having saved nothing for retirement, 95% of Americans having not saved enough for retirement, and 87% of American teens admitting not understanding their finances, financial literacy education in Delaware high schools is needed. This Act, which may be cited as âThe Equity and Inclusion in Financial Literacy for All High School Students in Delaware Actâ, requires high schools to provide, at a minimum, a 1/2 credit on financial literacy. And, beginning with students entering grade 9 in the 2026 through 2027 school year, successful completion of the credit will be required to obtain a high school diploma. This Act requires the credit to include instruction which meets the financial literacy standards for high school students adopted by the Department of Education. This substitute corrects a reference from "course" to "credit" in the synopsis.